incubator/apertium-glk/problem.glk.dix
    <pardef n="کود/ن__vblex" c="imperfect (past cont.)">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="شو/ئون__vblex" c="imperfect (past cont.) o-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l>یی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ئون</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ز/ِئن__vblex" c="imperfect (past cont.) e-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l>ه‌یی</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ِئن</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دَ/ئن__vblex" c="imperfect (past cont.) a-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l>یی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ئن</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نوکود/ن__vblex" c="negative preterite (past)">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نوشو/ئون__vblex" c="negative preterite (past) o-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-3-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-3-pp"/></e>

      <e><p><l>یی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ئون</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نز/ِئن__vblex" c="negative preterite (past) e-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ه‌یی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ِئن</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ندَ/ئن__vblex" c="negative preterite (past) a-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>

      <e><p><l>یی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ئن</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="شوئون"><p><l>شو</l><r>شو</r></p><par n="شو/ئون__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شوئون"><p><l>نوشو</l><r>شو</r></p><par n="نوشو/ئون__vblex"/></e>
